Massachusetts, session 194th, H3935.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter 131B the 
following chapter:- 
CHAPTER 131C. IVORY AND RHINOCEROS HORN TRAFFICKING 
Section 1. (a) As used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the following 
meanings, unless the context requires otherwise:- 
"Ivory", a tooth or tusk from any species of elephant, mammoth or mastodon, or a piece 
thereof, or an item or product containing a tooth or tusk from any of said species, or containing a 
piece thereof. 
"Rhinoceros horn", the horn, or a piece thereof, or derivative such as powder, of any 
species of rhinoceros, or an item or product containing rhinoceros horn or a piece or derivative 
thereof. 

of 6 12  "Total value”, the fair market value of the ivory or rhinoceros horn, or the actual price 
paid for the ivory or rhinoceros horn, whichever is greater. 
“Bona fide educational or scientific institution”, an institution that establishes through 
documentation an educational or a scientific tax exemption, from the federal Internal Revenue 
Service or the institution’s national or state tax authority. 
“Sale” or “sell”, selling, trading, bartering or offering for sale, trade or barter for 
monetary or nonmonetary consideration, including, but not limited to any transfer of ownership 
that occurs in the course of a commercial transaction. 
(i) The term does not include a nonmonetary transfer of ownership by way of gift, 
donation or bequest. 
(ii) For purposes of this section, a sale shall be deemed to occur in this Commonwealth if: 
(1) the buyer takes physical possession of the ivory or rhinoceros horn in this 
Commonwealth; or 
(2) the seller is located in this Commonwealth. 
Section 2. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary and in addition 
to the prohibitions and penalties established under sections 1 to 7, inclusive, of chapter 131A, no 
person shall sell, offer for sale, purchase, or possess with intent to sell, any ivory or rhinoceros 
horn, except as provided in this section. 
(b) It shall be prima facia evidence of possession with intent to sell when a person 
possesses ivory or rhinoceros horn in a retail or wholesale outlet; provided, however, that 

of 6 32 nothing in this subsection shall preclude a finding of intent to sell based on any other evidence 
which may independently establish such intent. 
(c) Subsection (a) shall not apply to 
(i) an employee or agent of the federal or state government undertaking a law 
enforcement activity pursuant to federal or state law or a mandatory duty required by federal 
law; 
(ii) an activity that is authorized by an exemption or permit under federal law or that is 
otherwise expressly authorized under federal law; 
(iii) ivory or rhinoceros horn that is a fixed component of a musical instrument, 
including, but not limited to, a string or wind instrument or piano; provided, however, that the 
ivory or rhinoceros horn was legally acquired; and provided further, that the total weight of the 
ivory or rhinoceros horn is less than 200 grams; 
(iv) ivory or rhinoceros horn that is a fixed component of an antique that is not made 
wholly or primarily of ivory or rhinoceros horn; provided, however that the antique status is 
established by the owner or seller thereof with documentation evidencing provenance and 
showing that the ivory or rhinoceros horn is not less than 100 years old, and provided that the 
total weight of the ivory or rhinoceros horn is less than 200 grams.; (v) manufactured or 
handcrafted items that contain a de minimis amount of ivory, provided, that the seller can 
demonstrate compliance with all of the following criteria: 
(1) the ivory was imported into the United States prior to January 18, 1990, or was 
imported into the United States under a Convention on International Trade in Endangered 

of 6 53 Species of Wild Fauna and Flora pre-Convention certificate with no limitation on its commercial 
use; 
(2) the ivory is a fixed or integral component of a larger manufactured or handcrafted 
item and is not in its current form the primary source of the value of the item; provided, however, 
that the ivory does not account for more than 50 percent of the value of the item; 
(3) the ivory is not raw; (4) the manufactured or handcrafted item is not made wholly or 
primarily of ivory; 
provided, however, that the ivory does not account for more than 50 percent of the item 
volume; (5) the total weight of the ivory component or components is less than 200 grams; and 
(6) the item was manufactured or handcrafted before July 6, 2016; (vi) the purchase, sale, offer 
for sale, or possession with intent to sell ivory or rhinoceros horn to a bona fide educational or 
scientific institution for educational or scientific purposes; provided, however, that: (1) the 
purchase, sale, offer for sale, or possession with intent to sell the ivory or rhinoceros horn is not 
prohibited by federal law; and (2) the ivory or rhinoceros horn was legally acquired before 
January 1, 1991, and was not subsequently transferred from one person to another for financial 
gain or profit after July 1, 2026; 
Section 3. (a) Violations of this chapter shall be punished: 
(i) for a first offense, by a fine of not more than $4,000 or 2 times the total value of the 
ivory and rhinoceros horn involved in the offense, whichever is greater, or imprisonment up to 6 
months in a house of correction, or both; 

of 6 73  (ii) for a second offense, by a fine of not less than $8,000 or 2 times the total value of the 
ivory and rhinoceros horn involved in the offense, whichever is greater, or by imprisonment for 
up to 18 months in a house of correction, or both; or 
(iii) for a third or subsequent offense or for an offense where the total value of the ivory 
or rhinoceros horn involved in the offense is not less than $25,000, by imprisonment for up to 
two and a half years in a house of correction and a fine of not less than $40,000 or 2 times the 
total value of the ivory and rhinoceros horn involved in the offense, whichever is greater. 
Fines assessed pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Elephant Ivory and Rhino 
Horn Trafficking Enforcement Fund under section 4. 
(b) Upon a conviction for violation of this chapter, the court shall order the seizure of all 
ivory and rhinoceros horn involved in the violation and shall transfer the products to the 
department of fish and game for proper disposition. The department, at its discretion, may 
destroy the ivory and rhinoceros horn or donate it to a bona fide educational or scientific 
institution . 
Section 4. (a) There shall be an Elephant Ivory and Rhinoceros Horn Trafficking 
Enforcement Fund. The director of law enforcement shall administer the fund to increase or 
expand enforcement and educational efforts related to the provisions of this chapter which may 
include financial rewards offered to a person providing information leading to the arrest and 
conviction of a person found to be in violation of this chapter. The office of law enforcement  
may use the fund for necessary and reasonable administrative and personnel costs related 
to the specific purposes of the fund. The office of law enforcement shall not use the fund for 

of 6 94 personnel or overhead costs not related to the purposes of the fund. The fund shall not be 
assessed any indirect costs. 
(b) There shall be credited to the fund: (i) all revenues received under section 3; (ii) 
revenue from appropriations or other money authorized by the general court and specifically 
designated to be credited to the fund; and (iii) funds from public or private sources including, but 
not limited to, gifts, grants, donations, rebates and settlements received by the commonwealth 
100 that are specifically designated to be credited to the fund. 
101  The fund may be expended by the director of law enforcement without further 
102 appropriation and any funds remaining at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the General 
103 Fund and shall be available for use in subsequent fiscal years. The director shall report annually, 
104 not later than October 1, on the fund's activity to the senate and house chairs of the joint 
105 committee on environment, natural resources and agriculture and the house and senate 
106 committees on ways and means. The report shall include, but not be limited to, an accounting of: 
107  (i) revenue received by the fund; (ii) expenditures from the fund, including the recipient, 
108 date and reason for the expenditure; and (iii) the total fund balance. 
109  SECTION 2. This act shall take effect 1 year from the date of passage.